Utah statutes.
38-1-23.   Creditors cannot reach materials furnished, except for purchase price.

Whenever materials have been furnished for use in the construction, alteration or repair of any building, work or other improvement mentioned in Section 38-1-3 such materials shall not be subject to attachment, execution or other legal process to enforce any debt due by the purchaser of such materials, other than a debt due for the purchase money thereof, so long as in good faith the same are about to be applied to the construction, alteration or repair of such building or improvement.

